Massachusetts, session 194th, S2507.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 260 of the Acts of 1956 is hereby amended by striking out section
1 as most recently amended by section 1 of Chapter 338 of the Acts of 1984, and inserting in
place thereof the following:-- " Section 1. There is hereby created a body politic and corporate to
be known as the Gloucester Fisheries Commission which shall be deemed to be a public
instrumentality for the purposes of this act and shall have an official seal as determined by the
membership of the commission."
SECTION 2. Said chapter 260 is hereby further amended by striking out section 2 and
inserting in place thereof the following section:-- "Section 2. Said commission shall be set up
and sponsored by the City of Gloucester to investigate, advocate and recommend measures for
the promotion, preservation and protection of the Gloucester Fishing Industry."
of 2

SECTION 3. Chapter 260 of the Acts of 1956 is hereby amended by striking Section 3 as
most recently amended by Section 3 of Chapter 338 of the Acts of 1984, and inserting in place
thereof the following section:-- " Section 3. The commission shall consist of seven members, one
of whom shall be the mayor or their designee. Six members shall be appointed by the mayor and
confirmed by the city council for a three-year term. The mayor may appoint, with confirmation
by the city council, two alternate members. The initial members of the commission shall have
staggered terms. The members shall be residents of the City of Gloucester and shall be
knowledgeable of the fishing industry. The chairperson and vice chairperson shall be elected by
a vote of the majority of the members present and voting thereon.
SECTION 4. Said chapter 260 is hereby further amended by striking out Section 3A, as
amended by Section 2 of said Chapter 361 of the Acts of 1980, and inserting in place thereof the
following section:-- "Section 3A. The Mayor may appoint an executive director who shall
receive such compensation as determined by the mayor."
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2